California statutes. Fish and Game Code
(a) Pursuant to this section, the department shall issue to a disabled veteran or recovering service member who has not been convicted of a violation of this code a reduced fee hunting license that authorizes the licensee to take a bird or mammal as authorized by this code and regulations adopted pursuant to this code.

(b) The base license fee for a reduced fee hunting license shall be four dollars ($4) for the hunting license year beginning on July 1, 1995, and, for the following years, this license fee may be annually reviewed and adjusted in accordance with Section 713.

(c) For the purposes of this section, the following terms have the following
 meanings:

(1) “Disabled veteran” means a person having a 50 percent or greater service-connected disability and an honorable discharge from military service.

(2) “Recovering service member” means a member of the military who meets the definition of “recovering service member” in Section 1602(7) of the federal National Defense Authorization Act for Fiscal Year 2008 (Public Law 110-181).

(d) A person applying for a reduced fee hunting license shall submit to the department adequate documentation for the department to determine whether the person is, in fact, eligible for a reduced fee hunting license. The department shall not issue a reduced fee hunting license to a person unless it is satisfied that the person has provided adequate documentation of eligibility for that license.

(e) A disabled veteran shall submit the following documentation:

(1) Proof of an honorable discharge from military service.

(2) Proof of the disability described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (c), either by certification from the United States Department of Veterans Affairs or by presentation of a license issued pursuant to this section in the preceding license year.

(f) A recovering service member shall submit a letter to the department stating that the person is a recovering service member as defined in subdivision (d), from either that person’s commanding officer or a military medical doctor. The letter may be submitted either in hard copy form or online.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 154, Sec. 63.   (AB 1527)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

3034.

(a) The department shall prepare a report to the Legislature no later than July 1, 2024, on the effects of the reduced-price tags issued pursuant to Sections 331, 332, 4751, and 4902 of the Fish and Game Code on rates of participation by junior hunters, the Big Game Management Account, and the Fish and Game Preservation Fund. The department shall collect relevant, sufficient, and appropriate data to evaluate the reduced-price tag program in the report, and make recommendations on improving the cost-effectiveness of those tags.

(b) The report required to be submitted pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(c) Pursuant to
 Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, this section is repealed on July 1, 2028.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 295, Sec. 7.   (AB 2151)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Section operative July 1, 2019, pursuant to Stats. 2018, Ch. 295, Sec. 12.   Repealed as of July 1, 2028, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

3037.

A hunting license authorizes the person to whom it is issued to take birds and mammals, in accordance with law, for a term of one year from July 1st to June 30th, or, if issued after the beginning of such term, for the remainder of the term.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1470.)
-------------------------------------------

3038.

Any member of the armed forces of the United States who is in a military medical facility and who is at least 70 percent disabled shall be issued a hunting permit, on application therefor, by the department, in lieu of a hunting license and appropriate tags, authorizing the taking of birds and mammals. If the permit covers a period during which birds or mammals may only be taken or shipped with appropriate tags, the department may issue such tags with the permit or shall endorse the permit to authorize such taking and shipping without such tags.

Such a permit shall be valid only during the period of time such person is in the medical facility and so disabled. Certification by the commanding officer of the military medical facility shall be sufficient proof of this period of time and extent of disability.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1470.)
-------------------------------------------

3039.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in this section, Section 2023, Section 3087, Section 4303, another provision of this code, or a regulation adopted pursuant to this code, it is unlawful to sell or purchase a bird or mammal found in the wild in California.

(b) Shed antlers, or antlers taken from domestically reared animals that have been manufactured into products or handicraft items, or that have been cut into blocks or units that are to be handcrafted or manufactured into those articles, may be purchased or sold at any time. However, complete antlers, whole heads with antlers, antlers that are mounted for display, or antlers in velvet may not be sold or purchased at any time, except as authorized by Section 3087.

(c) Notwithstanding Section 3504, inedible parts of domestically raised game birds may be sold or purchased at any time.

(d) A person who illegally takes a bird or mammal for profit or for personal gain by engaging in an activity authorized by this section is subject to civil liability pursuant to Section 2582.

(e) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2023.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 764, Sec. 3.5.   (AB 44)   Effective January 1, 2020.   Operative January 1, 2023, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

3040.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 3031, the director shall, no later than July 1, 2023, designate two days per year as “Free Hunting Days.” The department shall publish the exact dates of the free hunting days in annual publications of the department regarding current hunting regulations.

(b) (1) During a free hunting day, a California resident may hunt if accompanied by a hunter who meets all of following requirements:

(A) Holds a valid hunting license issued by the State of California.

(B) Is at least 21 years of age.

(C) Accompanies only one unlicensed hunter in the field at a time.

(2) An unlicensed hunter shall participate in the free hunting days for only one license year, and shall complete a hunter education course approved by the department and register with the department, or an agent of the department, before participating in a free hunting day. While engaged in hunting activities, an unlicensed hunter and the licensed supervising hunter shall remain in close visual and verbal contact with each other at all times so that the licensed hunter is able to provide adequate direction and immediately assume control of a firearm or other legal method of take used by the unlicensed hunter at any time.

(c) The department shall issue a
 free registration for free hunting days to any California resident who submits to the department all of the information required to issue an annual California hunting license and provides evidence of completing a course in hunter education as required in paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 3050. The free hunting day registration shall be valid from the date specified on the registration through the remainder of the license year for which the registration is issued.

(d) An unlicensed hunter who participates in a free hunting day shall have in their possession all of the following:

(1) A registration to hunt on free hunting days for that license year issued by the department pursuant to subdivision (c).

(2) Any
 required tags, validations, or report cards.

(3) Any required federal entitlements.

(4) Any required entry permits.

(e) An unlicensed hunter participating in free hunting days shall take only resident and migratory game birds, resident small game mammals, fur-bearing mammals, nongame mammals, and wild pigs with a wild pig validation.

(f) An unlicensed hunter participating in free hunting days shall not apply for any draw or lottery to obtain any tag, reservation, or other hunting opportunity.

(g) An unlicensed hunter hunting pursuant to this section is subject to all of the limitations,
 restrictions, conditions, statutes, rules, and regulations applicable to the holder of a valid hunting license, except all of the following:

(1) The requirement to possess a valid hunting license pursuant to Section 3031.

(2) The requirement to possess an upland game bird hunting validation pursuant to Section 3682.1.

(3) The requirement to possess a state duck hunting validation pursuant to Section 3700.1.

(h) An unlicensed hunter, who is 12 years of age or older, in possession of a registration to hunt on free hunting days may purchase one wild pig validation pursuant to Section 4654.

(i) (1) The department may adopt additional minimum requirements and restrictions for a licensed hunter or an unlicensed hunter participating in a free hunting day pursuant to this section.

(2) The department may adopt emergency regulations to implement this section in accordance with Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. The adoption of these regulations is an emergency and shall be considered by the Office of Administrative Law as necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, and general welfare. Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, an emergency regulation adopted by the department, or any amendments to it made by the department pursuant to this
 section,
 shall stay in effect until revised by the department.

(j) (1) On or before July 1, 2022, the department shall develop a plan to implement this section. The plan shall include, at a minimum, all of the following:

(A) A description of the scope of the emergency regulations necessary to implement this section.

(B) A description of the steps the department will take to implement this section.

(C) An estimate of the total costs to the department to implement this section.

(D) Identification of the source of the funds, including fees paid by hunters, necessary to
 implement this section.

(2) The estimate of the total costs to the department identified in subparagraph (C) of paragraph (1) shall include, but is not limited to, the costs of pursuing emergency regulations, updating existing or developing new hunting outreach materials for the free hunting days, any necessary revision to the Automated License Data System, and use of any department resources necessary to conduct the free hunting days.

(3) The department shall provide the plan required by paragraph (1) to the relevant legislative policy and budget committees and post the plan on its internet website.

(k) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2024.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 10) and added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 469, Sec. 11.   (SB 856)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Operative July 1, 2024, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2.5. Hunter’s Safety [3049. - 3054.]

3049.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this article to ensure the health and safety of its citizens engaged in activities requiring the use of hunting implements.

(b) The Legislature finds and declares that individuals who engage in hunting should possess an adequate understanding of hunter safety practices, principles of conservation, and positive sporting behavior.

(c) It is also the intent of the Legislature that persons so engaged be mindful of their responsibilities to others, toward wildlife, and toward their natural environment. The department shall take all steps necessary to carry out the provisions of this
 article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 132, Sec. 63.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

3050.

(a) No hunting license may be issued to any person unless he or she presents to the person authorized to issue that license any of the following:

(1) Evidence that he or she has held a hunting license issued by this state in a prior year.

(2) Evidence that he or she holds a current hunting license, or a hunting license issued in either of the two previous hunting years by another state or province.

(3) A certificate of completion of a course in hunter education, principles of conservation, and sportsmanship, as provided in this article. A hunter education
 instruction validation stamp shall be permanently affixed to certificates of completion that have been issued before January 1, 2008.

(4) A certificate of successful completion of a hunter education course in another state or province.

(5) Evidence of completion of a course in hunter education, principles of conservation, and sportsmanship, which the commission may, by regulation, require.

(b) The evidence required in subdivision (a) shall be forwarded to the department.

(c) Subdivision (a) does not apply to any person purchasing a hunting license under paragraph (5) of subdivision (a) of Section 3031. However, that license shall not qualify as evidence required in subdivision (a) of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 683, Sec. 16.   (SB 798)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

3051.

(a) The department shall provide for a course of instruction in hunter education, principles of conservation, and positive sporting behavior, and for this purpose may cooperate with any reputable association or organization having as one of its objectives the promotion of hunter safety, principles of conservation, and positive sporting behavior.

(b) The department may designate as a hunter education instructor any person found by it to be competent to give instruction in the courses required in this article.

(c) A hunter education instructor shall issue a certificate of completion as provided by the department to a person who completes a course of instruction in hunter safety, principles of
 conservation, and positive sporting behavior.

(d) The department shall prescribe a minimum level of skill and knowledge to be required of all hunter education instructors, and may limit the number of students per instructor in all required classes.

(e) The department may revoke the certificate of an instructor when, in the opinion of the department, it is in the best interest of the state to do so.

(f) In order to recruit and retain hunter education instructors, the department shall offer special hunting opportunities to qualified hunter education instructors by providing a limited number of existing tags and other hunting opportunities. The department may provide these tags and hunting opportunities through any of the following methods:

(1) The private
 lands management program described in Article 5 (commencing with Section 3400) of Chapter 2.

(2) The Shared Habitat Alliance for Recreational Enhancement (SHARE) program described in Article 3 (commencing with Section 1570) of Chapter 5 of Division 2.

(3) Entering into cooperative agreements with federal, state, and local agencies that hold title to, or administer, lands or waters.

(4) Entering into cooperative agreements with landowners or tenants seeking depredation permits for game mammals as described in Section 4188.

(5) Authorizing a maximum of 15 tags from the annual tag quota, as determined by the department.

(g) The department shall determine eligibility criteria for hunter
 education instructors seeking the hunting opportunities offered pursuant to subdivision (f). The department shall offer hunting opportunities to eligible hunter education instructors only by random drawing.

(h) The department may adopt regulations to implement this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 132, Sec. 64.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

3052.

A person receiving instruction from a hunter education instructor shall not be charged a fee for the service provided by the instructor, but may be charged a fee to cover the costs incurred by the instructor in teaching the class. A record of these costs shall be kept for inspection by the department. Costs may include, but are not limited to, range fees, ammunition, and transportation of students.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 154, Sec. 66.   (AB 1527)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

3053.

In the case of loss or destruction of a certificate, a duplicate certificate may be issued by the instructor who issued the original certificate, or, by an instructor of the sponsoring organization having adequate records to establish successful completion of the prescribed course, or by the department if verified by adequate records to establish successful completion of the prescribed course. An administrative fee of three dollars ($3) shall be charged for the issuance of a duplicate certificate, for the hunting license year commencing on July 1, 1990, and, for the following years as adjusted pursuant to Section 713.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 530, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

3054.

The department shall furnish information on hunter safety, principles of conservation, and sportsmanship that shall be distributed free of charge to persons designated as hunter education instructors for instructional purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 285, Sec. 60.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Special Colorado River Hunting Licenses [3060. - 3063.]

3060.

The department, in conformity with such regulations as the commission may prescribe, may issue special Colorado River hunting licenses when the commission finds and determines that under the laws of the State of Arizona substantially similar licenses are authorized to be issued to licensees of the State of California upon substantially the same terms and conditions as are provided for in this article as to the issuance of licenses to licensees of the State of Arizona.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

3061.

A special Colorado River hunting license may be issued to any person holding a hunting license issued by the State of Arizona.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

3062.

A special Colorado River hunting license shall entitle the holder thereof to take only migratory waterfowl and only in, on, or along the Colorado River in accordance with the applicable state and federal laws and regulations or orders made pursuant thereto.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

3063.

The fee for a special Colorado River hunting license shall be two dollars ($2), and each such license shall be valid until the end of the calendar year in which it is issued.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Possession of Birds and Mammals After Season [3080. - 3087.]

3080.

(a) For the purposes of this section, “donor intermediary” means a recipient who receives a game bird or mammal from a donor to give to a charitable organization or charitable entity.

(b) A person may possess a game bird or mammal during a period other than the open season for that game bird or mammal, up to the possession limit allowed for that game bird or mammal during the open season, in any of the following circumstances:

(1) The person possesses a hunting license and a validated tag or tags for the species possessed, or a copy of the license and tag or tags. The license and tag or tags shall have been issued to that person for the current or immediate
 past license year.

(2) The person is a donor intermediary who received the game bird or mammal from a donor described in paragraph (1), and has a written confirmation of the donation that is signed and dated by the donor, and a photocopy of the donor’s hunting license and the applicable validated tag or tags from the current or immediate past license year.

(3) The person is a donor intermediary who received the game bird or mammal from a donor described in paragraph (1), and has a written confirmation of the donation signed and dated by the donor, which includes the donor’s name, address, hunting license number, and applicable tag numbers for the species possessed. The license and tag or tags shall be for the current or immediate past license year.

(c) The documentation required by subdivision (b) shall be made
 available to the department as described in Section 2012. There is no required format for the documentation. Any written documentation containing the required information shall be deemed to comply with this section. A charitable organization or charitable entity receiving and distributing a game bird or mammal for a charitable or humane purpose shall maintain the documentation described in paragraph (2) or (3) of subdivision (b) for one year from the date of disposal.

(d) This section does not authorize the possession of a game bird contrary to regulations adopted pursuant to the federal Migratory Bird Treaty Act (16 U.S.C. Sec. 703 et seq.).

(e) On or before January 1, 2015, and subject to the requirements of subdivision (d), the commission shall recommend legislation or adopt regulations to clarify when a possession limit is not violated by processing into food lawfully taken
 game birds or mammals.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 154, Sec. 67.   (AB 1527)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

3086.

Cold storage plants and frozen food locker plants shall make and keep a complete detailed record of all game birds or mammals stored in such plants. A record of each game bird or mammal shall be made at the time it is received at the plant for storage.

The record shall be open for inspection at all times by wardens of the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 253.)
-------------------------------------------

3087.

(a) (1) Every person who prepares, stuffs, or mounts the skin of any fish, reptile, amphibian, bird, or mammal for another person for a fee shall make and keep an accurate and detailed record, as prescribed by regulations of the commission, regarding all fish, reptile, amphibian, bird, or mammal carcasses, skins, or parts thereof that are acquired, possessed, or stored for taxidermy purposes.

(2) The record required by this section shall be made at the time the fish, reptile, amphibian, bird, or mammal carcasses, skins, or parts thereof, are received, and shall include the name and address of each person from and to whom fish, reptile, amphibian, bird, or mammal carcasses, skins, or parts thereof are received or delivered and the number and species of all fish, reptile, amphibian, bird, or mammal carcasses, skins, or parts thereof received or delivered. The record shall be open for inspection at all times pursuant to regulations adopted by the commission.

(b) (1) Where a taxidermist has prepared, stuffed, or mounted the skin of any fish, reptile, amphibian, bird, or mammal for another person and that person does not pay the cost thereof, or take delivery thereof, the taxidermist may sell the skin only if the commission adopts regulations permitting the sale.

(2) The commission may adopt regulations permitting a sale pursuant to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 3046) of Title 14 of Part 4 of Division 3 of the Civil Code, and may adopt any other regulations governing the sale, including, but not limited to, regulations that require a taxidermist to record, and provide to the department, the name and address of any person failing to pay for work performed on a skin, that list species of fish, reptiles, amphibians, birds, or mammals whose prepared skins shall not be sold, and that limit the sales price of prepared skins to the actual cost of preparation.

(3) The commission may adopt regulations permitting a sale of a prepared skin pursuant to this subdivision only if the commission also adopts regulations that require the posting of a notice or otherwise giving notice at the place of business of the taxidermist informing patrons of this subdivision and regulations adopted pursuant thereto.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 285, Sec. 64.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Commercial Activities [3200. - 3480.]



  ARTICLE 1. Domesticated Game Breeding [3200. - 3219.]

3200.

Any person engaged in raising or importing, or who keeps in captivity, in this state domesticated game birds or domesticated game mammals which normally exist in the wild in this state shall procure a domesticated game breeder’s license if the birds or mammals are kept more than 30 days after acquisition. No license is, however, required of any of the following:

(a) Licensed pheasant clubs.

(b) Licensed domesticated migratory game bird shooting areas as defined in Article 4 (commencing with Section 3300) of Chapter 2 of Part 1 of Division 4.

(c) Keepers of hotels, restaurants, boardinghouses, or clubs serving the meat of
 those birds or mammals for actual consumption on the premises.

(d) Retail meat dealers selling that meat to customers for actual consumption.

(e) Public zoological gardens possessing those birds or mammals for exhibition purposes or for the purpose of disposing of the birds or mammals by sale, exchange, or donation to other public zoological gardens.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 132, Sec. 65.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

3201.

No person shall sell the carcass of any domesticated game bird or mammal without first obtaining a domesticated game breeder’s license from the department. The department may issue such a license upon terms and conditions as the commission may prescribe, and the commission may at any time revoke such a license for sufficient cause.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 234, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

3202.

There are classes of domesticated game breeder’s licenses, designated “class 1” and “class 2.”

(a) A class 1 domesticated game breeder’s license authorizes the licensee to engage in all domesticated game breeding activities except that not more than 175 Chinese ringneck or Mongolian ringneck pheasants, or both, or hybrids thereof, may be sold under a class 1 license.

(b) A class 2 domesticated game breeder’s license is required in order to sell more than 175 Chinese ringneck or Mongolian ringneck pheasants, or both, or hybrids thereof, and entitles the licensee to all the rights and privileges of a class 1 license.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 244, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

3203.

The department shall issue a class 1 domesticated game breeder’s license upon the payment of a base fee of eight dollars ($8), as adjusted under Section 713, and a class 2 domesticated game breeder’s license upon the payment of a base fee of forty dollars ($40), as adjusted under Section 713.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 589, Sec. 62.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

3204.

Licenses issued under the provisions of this article are valid for a term of one year from January 1st, or, if issued after the beginning of such term, for the remainder thereof.

A domesticated game breeder’s license shall be conspicuously displayed on the property where the birds or mammals are held in captivity.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

3205.

Carriers for hire may carry within the State live domesticated game birds and mammals upon such terms and conditions as the commission may prescribe.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

3206.

No domesticated game bird or mammal shall be transported or sold dead unless each quarter and each loin of the carcass of each large mammal, the carcass of each bird, except as provided in Section 2401 for a domesticated game bird raised outside this State, and the carcass of each small mammal is tagged with a domesticated game breeder’s tag or seal. The tag or seal shall not be removed until such quarter, loin, or carcass is prepared for consumption.

No tag so affixed shall be used again.

No tag or seal shall be sold by the department to anyone other than a person who is legally in possession of domesticated game.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

3207.

The department shall collect three cents ($0.03) for each tag or seal.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

3208.

On or before January 31st of each year, every person to whom a domesticated game breeder’s license has been issued shall report the following to the department on a form provided by the department:

(a) The total number of each species of game birds and mammals killed, sold, or shipped during the preceding year.

(b) The names of the persons to whom such game birds or mammals were sold or shipped.

(c) The name of the person in whose presence such game birds or mammals were tagged.

(d) A complete list of the game birds and mammals held in his possession at the time the report is made.

Such report shall be verified by the affidavit of the licensee.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

3209.

(a) In lieu of the tag required by Section 3206, poultry processing plants licensed pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 18650) or Chapter 4.1 (commencing with Section 18940) of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Food and Agricultural Code, which process domesticated game birds received from persons licensed pursuant to this article, may package each individual carcass in a nonreusable container clearly labeled on the outside with the species of bird and the wording “Product of a Licensed California Domesticated Game Breeder.”

(b) Each processor receiving domesticated game birds shall keep a complete record of all birds received showing all of the following:

(1) The date received.

(2) The number and species of birds in each lot or shipment.

(3) The complete name, address, and domesticated game breeders’ license number of the person from whom the birds were received.

(4) The disposition of processed birds, the date of sale or shipment, the quantity and species sold or shipped, and the person to whom the birds were sold or shipped.

(c) The records shall be retained by the processor for one year following date of processing. These records shall be subject to inspection upon demand by any officer of the department during hours the processing plant is in operation or open for business.

(d) This section does not affect the requirements of Section 3206 governing tagging domesticated game birds for transportation by those other than licensed poultry processors.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 65, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

3212.

The keeper of a hotel, restaurant, boardinghouse, or club may sell portions of a quarter or loin of a large mammal, or the carcass of a game bird or mammal raised or imported under a domesticated game breeder’s license, to a patron for actual consumption on the premises only, and no license for that purpose shall be required of such keeper or club. All keepers of hotels, restaurants, boardinghouses, or clubs who sell any such game for consumption to a patron shall be required to submit to the inspection of their premises by the department and shall display for such inspection any carcass or parts thereof held in storage for sale. All such game shall be tagged under Section 3206.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

3213.

A retail meat dealer may, without a license, sell portions of a quarter or loin of a large mammal or the carcass of a game bird or mammal raised or imported under a domesticated game breeder’s license to a customer for actual consumption.

Retail dealers shall submit their premises to inspection by the department, and shall display at any authorized inspection any carcass or parts thereof held by them in storage. Such game meat or carcasses shall be tagged under Section 3206.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

3214.

Domesticated game breeders or other persons holding domesticated game mammals in captivity shall confine the mammals in escape-proof cages or enclosures. In the event any of the mammals escape from the cages or enclosures, the owner shall immediately make every reasonable effort to recapture them. If the owner fails to recapture the escaped mammals, the department may capture the mammals or remove them from the wild by whatever means may be necessary if, in the opinion of the department, the mammals may conflict with native species of birds or mammals or cause damage to public or private property. The owner shall reimburse the department for all costs incurred in capturing or removing the mammals from the wild. The owner of the mammals shall be responsible for any damage they may cause to public or private property.

Any domesticated big game mammal may be marked with ear tags or other suitable markings or tags, as may be specified by the commission, which shall identify the owner of the mammals.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1970, Ch. 527.)
-------------------------------------------

3216.

All domesticated game birds and mammals, excepting deer, sold under the provisions of this article, shall be killed otherwise than by shooting. This section does not apply to licensed pheasant clubs, licensed domesticated migratory game bird shooting areas, or to the training or practice of hunting dogs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1312.)
-------------------------------------------

3217.

The carcass of a game bird which shows that it has been killed by shooting shall constitute prima facie evidence that it was not a domesticated game bird. The fact that the bird has been tagged in accordance with Section 3206 of this code shall not alter this presumption.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

3218.

Any license issued under this article may be revoked by the commission upon conviction of the licensee of a violation of any provision of this code, and no similar license may be issued to the licensee during the same license year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 234, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

3219.

Domesticated reindeer may be imported into this State and sold only in accordance with regulations which the commission may prescribe.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Commercial Hunting Clubs [3240.5. - 3246.]

3240.5.

(a) For purposes of this article, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Commercial hunting club” means property with respect to which a fee is imposed or collected for either of the following:

(A) Taking or attempting to take birds or mammals on the property.

(B) A type of entry or use permit that includes permission to take birds or mammals on the property.

(2) “Property” means a number of contiguous legal parcels owned by one or more owners and held out for a common purpose.

(b) A person, including, but not limited to, an owner, renter, or lessee, who is in possession or control of a commercial hunting club, shall procure a commercial hunting club license before a bird or mammal may be taken on the property.

(c) This article does not apply under any of the following circumstances:

(1) The fees described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) that are received by the owner, renter or lessee of the property are less than one hundred dollars ($100) per entrant and total less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) between July 1 and the following June 30. Pursuant to Section 713, department may adjust the threshold amounts established in this paragraph.

(2) The property is used in conjunction with the Shared Habitat Alliance for
 Recreational Enhancement (SHARE) program under Article 3 (commencing with Section 1570) of Chapter 5 of Division 2.

(3) A domesticated game bird hunting club licensed under Article 3 (commencing with Section 3270) operates on the property.

(4) A domesticated migratory game bird shooting area licensed under Article 4 (commencing with Section 3300) operates on the property.

(5) The property is used by a hunting club or program licensed under regulations adopted pursuant to this code.

(6) The property is used in conjunction with the private wildlife habitat enhancement and management program under Article 5 (commencing with Section 3400).

(7) The property is used for an officially sanctioned
 field trial event pursuant to regulations adopted pursuant to this code.

(8) The property is subject to a recorded state, federal, or nonprofit wildlife conservation or agricultural easement or is enrolled in a habitat protection or enhancement program under this code, including, but not limited to, Article 7 (commencing with Section 3460).

(d) This chapter does not apply to an owner of property that is rented or leased to a commercial hunting club, if the owner is not involved in the operation of the club and the club is licensed in accordance with this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 154, Sec. 68.   (AB 1527)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

3241.

(a) An application for a commercial hunting club license shall be submitted on a form furnished by the department. The application, which shall set forth all of the exemptions and conditions established in Section 3240.5, shall require the applicant to include all of the following information:

(1) The name of the club and the ownership.

(2) The business telephone number and mailing address of the club.

(3) The number of properties used by the club and the physical location of each property.

(4) The total acreage of the club property.

(5) A list of all species of game hunted on the club property.

(6) Information as to whether the club owner owns any of the properties used by the club.

(7) The name and address of each property owner, if the property owner is substantially involved in the operation of the club, but does not own the club.

(8) The signature and title of the applicant.

(9) Any other information the department may require.

(b) The department shall allow a commercial hunting club that leases or rents more than one property for hunting purposes to submit a single application listing each of the properties for which the club is seeking a license, if
 all of the information required for each property is submitted in a format approved by the department.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 394, Sec. 8.   (AB 1423)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

3242.

(a) The department may issue a commercial hunting club license to any person upon submission of a completed application and payment of the required fee, according to the number of properties used by the club, as follows:

(1) The fee for one property shall be two hundred dollars ($200).

(2) The fee for two to five properties shall be five hundred dollars ($500).
